Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 2. Penalties

§ 23-6-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1, defined various degrees of misdemeanors.

§ 23-6-202.
Fines and sentences.

Any person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense under this act may be fined, sentenced to the county jail, or both, as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62, § 2.

Up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) to which may be added imprisonment up to one (1) year when the offense is a high misdemeanor;

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62, § 2.

Up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) to which may be added imprisonment up to six (6) months when the offense is a low misdemeanor;

through (xi) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-116; Laws 1981, ch. 169, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing the harvest of bighorn sheep and the registration of horns, see §

23-3-117

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00),” and substituted “high” for “2nd degree” in (ii); substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00),” substituted “low” for “5th degree” in (v); and repealed (i), (iii), (iv), (vi) through (xi), which related to fines, sentencing and degree of misdemeanor.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-203.
Penalty for violations when no separate penalty provided.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act for which no separate penalty is provided is guilty of a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 88; C.S. 1945, § 47-527; W.S. 1957, § 23-5; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-117; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree misdemeanor.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-204.
Penalty for violations generally.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 69, § 2.

Any person who takes any remaining wildlife not specified in W.S. 23-3-102(a) or (d) except as permitted by this act and for which no separate penalty is provided is guilty of a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

In addition to any other penalty imposed under this act, any person who takes any wildlife for competition in any hunting or fishing event at which rewards or prizes are offered as part of the competition and the wildlife is taken in violation of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor subject to a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) or two (2) times the amount of the competition reward or prize, whichever is greater.

In addition to the penalties imposed under this section, any person violating this section may be required to make restitution to the state for the value of the wildlife taken in violation of this act, in an amount determined by the court based upon the recommendation of the commission. Amounts collected under this subsection shall be paid to the account within the game and fish fund under W.S. 23-1-501(e).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 91; C.S. 1945, § 47-532; W.S. 1957, § 23-4; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-118; Laws 1989, ch. 163, § 1; 1993, ch. 186, § 1; 1995, ch. 69, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 91, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree misdemeanor” in (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-205.
Accessory before or after the fact.

A person who counsels or aids in a violation of any provision of this act or an order of the commission, or knowingly shares in any of the proceeds of the violation by receiving or possessing any wildlife, is guilty of the violation which he counsels or aids, or the proceeds of which he knowingly shares.

In any case where possession, transportation, buying, or selling of wildlife is unlawful solely because the taking was unlawful, the possession, transportation, buying, or selling by a person other than a person guilty of the unlawful taking is punishable only if done with knowledge that the taking was unlawful.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-119.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-206.
Revocation of license; hunting after suspended license.

The court may, in its discretion, revoke any license issued under this act to any person convicted of a violation of this act, for the remainder of the year in which the conviction occurs, and may suspend the person’s privilege to purchase or receive any other license under this act, or to take any wildlife for the following time periods provided in paragraphs (i) through (iii) and shall suspend the person’s privilege to purchase or receive any other license under this act for the time period provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection:

Not less than five (5) years for a conviction of any violation under W.S. 23-3-102(d);

Up to six (6) years for conviction of a high misdemeanor as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii);

Up to three (3) years for conviction of a low misdemeanor as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v);

Three (3) years for a conviction of any violation under W.S. 23-2-104(d).

No person whose license has been forfeited or privilege to purchase another license suspended shall procure, purchase, or possess another license during the period of forfeiture or suspension. If the person procures, purchases, or possesses another license during such period, the license is invalid and that person is not entitled to receive another license for up to six (6) years next succeeding the original revocation or suspension period. Violation of this subsection constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

No person whose license has been forfeited or privilege to purchase another license suspended shall take any wildlife prohibited by the court during the period of forfeiture or suspension. If the person takes any wildlife prohibited by the court during such period, that person is not entitled to receive another license for up to six (6) years next succeeding the original revocation or suspension period. Violation of this subsection constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

The court may revoke the privileges of a person convicted of a violation of this act to purchase or receive any license or take any wildlife prohibited by the court until all fines, costs and restitution imposed by the court are satisfied. Any person who violates this subsection shall be punished pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

“Conviction” means a determination of guilt by any Wyoming court having legal jurisdiction of the offense from which no appeal is legally perfected. Pleas of nolo contendere and forfeitures of bail shall be deemed convictions for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 93, § 34; R.S. 1931, § 49-208; C.S. 1945, § 47-536; W.S. 1957, § 23-46; Laws 1969, ch. 62, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-120; Laws 1989, ch. 163, § 1; 1995, ch. 69, § 1; 2007, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; ch. 194, § 1; 2009, ch. 24, § 1.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 16, § 1, inserted “or to take any wildlife” in (a); in (b), substituted “up to six (6) years” for “the year,” substituted “original revocation or suspension period” for “year in which a conviction of a violation of this subsection occurs,” and substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree”; redesignated former (c) as (e) and inserted present (c) and (d).

Laws 2007, ch. 16, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February. 14, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a), deleted “except for conviction of a 10th or 11th degree misdemeanor” preceding “may suspend” in the introductory language, substituted “high misdemeanor as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “1st degree through 6th degree misdemeanor” in (ii); substituted “low misdemeanor as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “7th degree through 9th degree misdemeanor” in (iii); and substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The third 2007 amendment, by ch. 194, § 1, in (a), deleted “except for conviction of a 10th or 11th degree misdemeanor” preceding “may suspend the person's privilege,” inserted “provided in paragraphs (i) through (iii) and shall suspend the person's privilege to purchase or receive any other license under this act for the time period provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection”; and added (a)(iv).

Laws 2007, ch. 194, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” in (b) and (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-207.
Revocation of license of commercial operation or business.

The commission may revoke the license of any commercial operation or business for any violation of this act or an order of the commission pertaining to his business or operation. The commission may refuse to issue another license to any person whose license is revoked under this section for any period of time it deems desirable.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-121.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

Severability. —

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 4, provides: “If any provision of this act is held to be unconstitutional, such a ruling shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect without the unconstitutional provision; and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

§ 23-6-208.
Forfeiture of devices and equipment used in taking game illegally; procedure.

Devices and equipment, including any firearm, weapon, ammunition, trap, snare, vessel, motorized vehicle, aircraft, explosive, poisonous substance, electronic device or optical equipment, used in, or in aid of, a violation of W.S. 23-3-102(d) or

23-3-107

may be seized by any law enforcement officer of the state after hearing and upon order issued by the court of original jurisdiction when the value of the devices or equipment is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or less or by the district court for the county in which the offense was charged when the value of the devices or equipment is more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any device or equipment seized under this section shall be forfeited to the state in accordance with W.S.

7-2-105

, provided the device or equipment is not subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any unlawful act committed without the knowledge or consent of the owner. A device or equipment seized under this section shall not be forfeited as provided under this section until after the person has been convicted under W.S. 23-3-102(d) or

23-3-107

and the time for appeal has expired.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 94, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to authority to seize deadly weapons, see §

7-2-104

.